District of Columbia statutes.
50-2636

Enforcement of parking meters in Premium Demand Parking Meter Rate Zones.

As of October 1, 2015, the District Department of Transportation shall provide for enforcement of parking meters in Premium Demand Parking Meter Rate Zones from 7:00 a.m. until midnight.

History

Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6004, 62 DCR 10905

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 6004 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of section, see § 2 of the Fiscal Year 2016 Second Budget Support Clarification Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-202, Nov. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 15276).